North Dakota statutes. CONSTITUTION OF NORTH DAKOTA
ARTICLE IX SCHOOL AND PUBLIC LANDS

Section 153.

Renumbered as Article IX, § 1.

Section 154.

Renumbered as Article IX, § 2.

Section 155.

Renumbered as Article IX, § 5.

Section 156.

Renumbered as Article IX, § 3.

Section 157.

Renumbered as Article IX, § 4.

Section 158.

Renumbered as Article IX, § 6.

Section 159.

Repealed by art. amd. 89, approved September 1, 1970 (S.L. 1969, ch. 594, § 3; 1971, ch. 618, § 3). (See Article IX, § 1, of the renumbered constitution.) The section as originally adopted read:

All land, money or other property donated, granted or received from the United States or any other source for a University, School of Mines, Reform School, Agricultural College, Deaf and Dumb Asylum, Normal School or other educational or charitable institution
or purpose, and the proceeds of all such lands and other property so received from any source, shall be and remain perpetual funds, the interest and income of which, together with the rents of all such lands as may remain unsold shall
be inviolably appropriated and applied to the specific objects of the original grants or gifts. The principal of every such fund may be increased but shall never be diminished, and the interest and income only shall be used. Every
such fund shall be deemed a trust fund held by the state, and the state shall make good all losses thereof.

Section 160.

Renumbered as Article IX, § 7.

Section 161.

Renumbered as Article IX, § 8.

Section 162.

Repealed by art. amd. 89, approved September 1, 1970 (S.L. 1969, ch. 594, § 3; 1971, ch. 618, § 3). The section as amended by art. amd. 61, approved June 24, 1952 (S.L. 1953, p. 589) read:

The moneys of the permanent school fund and other educational funds shall be invested only in bonds of school corporations or of counties, or of townships, or of municipalities within the state, bonds issued for the construction of drains under authority
of law within the state, bonds of the United States, bonds of the state of North Dakota, or on first mortgages on farm lands in this state to the extent such mortgages are guaranteed or insured by the United States or any instrumentality
thereof, or if not so guaranteed or insured, not exceeding in amount one-half of the actual value of any subdivision on which the same may be loaned such value to be determined by the board of appraisal of school lands.

The section as amended by art. amd. 39, approved November 2, 1920 (S.L. 1917, ch. 94; 1919, ch. 95) read:

The moneys of the permanent school fund and other educational funds shall be invested only in bonds of school corporations or of counties, or of townships, or of municipalities within the state, bonds issued for the construction of drains under authority
of law within the state, bonds of the United States, bonds of the state of North Dakota, or on first mortgages on farm lands in this state, not exceeding in amount one-half of the actual value of any subdivision on which the same may
be loaned such value to be determined by the board of appraisal of school lands.

The section as amended by art. amd. 8, approved November 3, 1908 (S.L. 1905, p. 351; 1907, p. 456) read:

The moneys of the permanent school fund and other educational funds shall be invested only in bonds of school corporations, or of counties, or of townships, or of municipalities within the state, bonds issued for the construction of drains under authority
of law within the state, bonds of the United States, bonds of the state of North Dakota, bonds of other states; provided, such states have never repudiated any of their indebtedness, or on first mortgages on farm lands in this state,
not exceeding in amount one-third of the actual value of any subdivision on which the same may be loaned, such value to be determined by the board of appraisal of school lands.

The section as amended by art. amd. 7A, approved November 6, 1906 (S.L. 1903, p. 294; 1905, p. 349) read:

The moneys of the permanent school fund, and other educational funds, shall be invested only in bonds of school corporations, or of counties or townships within the state, bonds of the United States, bonds of the state of North Dakota, municipal bonds,
or on first mortgages on farm lands in the state, not exceeding in amount one-third of the actual value of any subdivision on which the same may be loaned, such value to be determined by the board of appraisal of school lands.

The section as originally adopted read:

The moneys of the permanent school fund and other educational funds shall be invested only in bonds of school corporations within the state, bonds of the United States, bonds of the state of North Dakota, or in first mortgages on farm lands in the state,
not exceeding in amount one-third of the actual value of any subdivision on which the same may be loaned, such value to be determined by the board of appraisers of school lands.

Section 163.

Renumbered as Article IX, § 9.

Section 164.

Renumbered as Article IX, § 10.

Section 165.

Renumbered as Article IX, § 11.